Illinois, session 104th, SB87.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Consensual Non-Transplant Donation Regulation Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Accrediting body" means a nationally recognized agency 8approved by the Department that provides certification for a 9business organization operating a non-transplant anatomical 10donation organization. 11    "Arranger" means the individual who is talking with, 12coordinating with, facilitating, or presenting the option of 13non-transplant anatomical donation to a potential donor, 14donor's family, or responsible authorizing agent on behalf of 15a non-transplant anatomical donation organization. With 16regards to the Secretary of State's role in non-transplant 17anatomical donation under Section 6-117 of the Illinois 18Vehicle Code, the Secretary of State shall not be considered 19the arranger. 20    "Chain of custody record" means a record that establishes 21the continuous control of a uniquely identified body, body 22parts, or human remains. 23    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.   SB0087- 2 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    "Director" means the Director of Public Health. 2    "Distribution" means a process that includes selection and 3evaluation of intended use of non-transplant anatomical 4material or a non-transplant anatomical donation, a human 5body, or human body part for release to an education facility 6or a research facility according to State law. 7    "Donor" means a person who has knowingly consented in 8accordance with applicable law to the transfer of a person's 9deceased body or body part, not for use in transplantation, 10for education, research, or the advancement of medical, 11dental, or mortuary science. 12    "Donor's family" means the next of kin to the donor with 13the legal authority to consent to non-transplant anatomical 14donation on behalf of the donor in accordance with Section 5-5 15of the Illinois Anatomical Gift Act. 16    "End user" means the education or research institution 17that receives the non-transplant anatomical donation from a 18licensed non-transplant anatomical donation organization. 19        (1) A "primary end user" is the donor's, donor's 20    family's, or the responsible authorizing agent's first in 21    priority choice of an education or research institution to 22    receive the non-transplant anatomical material under this 23    Act. 24        (2) A "secondary end user" is the donor's, donor's 25    family's, or the responsible authorizing agent's second in 26    priority choice of an education or research institution to   SB0087- 3 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    receive the non-transplant anatomical material under this 2    Act. 3    "Entity" means a non-transplant anatomical donation 4organization that is accredited, licensed, or approved under 5federal law or the laws of this State to engage in the 6recovery, screening, testing, processing, distribution, or 7storage of human bodies or body parts. 8    "Exceptional release" means non-transplant anatomical 9material that is approved for usage before a donor 10acceptability assessment or by a researcher requesting 11non-transplant anatomical material that would not normally 12meet the established acceptability criteria. 13    "Environmental services" means activities such as 14housekeeping, laundry, facility maintenance, or equipment 15maintenance. 16    "Final disposition" means the final disposal of 17non-transplant anatomical material or a non-transplant 18anatomical donation through incineration, cremation, 19bio-cremation, burial, full depletion by virtue of a 20particular use, or by another legal means. 21    "Education" means the use of a human body or body parts for 22teaching or training individuals, including, but not limited 23to, medical, dental, or mortuary science students or 24professionals, with regard to the anatomy and characteristics 25of the human body, disease detection, and such other uses as 26may be specified by the Department by rule.   SB0087- 4 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    "Human body" means a deceased human body or non-transplant 2anatomical donation. 3    "Human body part" or "body part" means an organ, tissue, 4eye, bone, blood vessel, or any other portion of a human body 5that is subject to an anatomical gift or other transfer made 6under State law. "Human body part" does not include blood 7drawn for medical purposes or a growing cell line. 8    "Institution" means a facility established by law for the 9purpose of education, research, or the advancement of medical, 10dental, or mortuary science. 11    "Licensee" means a person to whom the Department has 12issued a license to operate a non-transplant anatomical 13donation organization. 14    "Misuse" means to use non-transplant anatomical material 15and non-transplant anatomical donations for purposes other 16than education or research. 17    "Non-transplant anatomical donation" means a donation of a 18whole body, organ, or tissue authorized and used for education 19and research prior to release to distribution inventory. 20    "Non-transplant anatomical material" means a whole body or 21part of a body donated for use in education or research that 22has been prepared, packaged, labeled, and released to 23distribution inventory. 24    "Non-transplant anatomical donation organization" means an 25entity that is accredited, licensed, or approved under federal 26law or State law to engage in the recovery, screening,   SB0087- 5 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1testing, processing, distribution, or storage of human bodies 2or body parts for purposes of education, research or the 3advancement of medical, dental, or mortuary science. 4    "Research" does not include an autopsy or examination 5conducted as part of a criminal investigation. 6    "Responsible authorizing party" means an individual with 7the legal authority to consent to non-transplant anatomical 8donation on behalf of a donor in accordance with Section 5-5 of 9the Illinois Anatomical Gift Act. 10    "Secondary specific use consent" means the opportunity for 11a donor's family or responsible authorizing agent to modify 12the specific use the donor, the donor's family, or responsible 13authorizing agent consented to in the universal donor consent 14form. 15    "Specific use" means the specified purpose, whether 16education or research related, consented to by the donor, the 17donor's family, or a responsible authorizing agent to a 18specified end user consented to by the donor, the donor's 19family, or a responsible authorizing agent within the 20universal donor consent form. 21    "Storage" means a designated area that contains equipment, 22instruments, and supplies necessary to maintain non-transplant 23anatomical donations or non-transplant anatomical material 24until distribution or final disposition. 25    "Transfer" means to move from a non-transplant anatomical 26donation organization to an institution.   SB0087- 6 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    "Unique identifier" means providing the deceased with 2individual identification, through tagging, numbering, QR 3code, or other individualized means, that is affixed to the 4dead body, the body bag, and any body part, organ, or tissue 5separated from the deceased to be used in non-transplant 6anatomical donation in order to prevent misidentification of 7human remains. 8    "Universal donor consent form" means the legal record of a 9gift of non-transplant anatomical material permitting and 10defining acquisition and specific use of non-transplant 11anatomical material for education and research. 12    Section 10. License required. Except as provided by this 13Act, no person shall open, manage, conduct, offer, maintain, 14or advertise as a non-transplant anatomical donation 15organization without a valid license issued by the Department. 16A non-transplant anatomical donation organization established 17by law to conduct business in the State of Illinois that 18acquires or transfers a human body or human body part for 19education, research, or the advancement of medical, dental, or 20mortuary science, and not for use in human transplantation, 21shall register and be licensed by the Department at such time 22and in such manner as the Department may require. All 23non-transplant anatomical donation organizations in existence 24on the effective date of this Act shall obtain a valid license 25to operate within 2 years after the adoption of rules by the   SB0087- 7 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1Department to implement this Act.  2    Section 15. Contents of license application. An applicant 3for a license or license renewal under this Section shall 4submit an application to the Department containing such 5information as the Department may require by rule on the 6activities to be carried out pursuant to licensure. Unless 7otherwise set forth by administrative rule, the application 8shall include: 9        (1) the name of the applicant, including all trade 10    names under which the applicant conducts business; 11        (2) the date on which the applicant first began or 12    will begin commencing activities described in this Act; 13        (3) a list of all addresses at which the applicant 14    conducts business; 15        (4) a description of the premises and equipment used 16    by the applicant; 17        (5) a description of the types of service provided by 18    the applicant; 19        (6) identification of all officers and administrators 20    of the applicant; 21        (7) an attestation that the applicant will keep 22    records, including, but not limited to, the chain of 23    custody record, in accordance with the requirements of 24    this Act; 25        (8) an attestation that the applicant will use the   SB0087- 8 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    universal donor consent form in accordance with the 2    requirements of this Act; 3        (9) an attestation that the applicant will uniquely 4    identify all human bodies or human body parts in 5    accordance with the requirements of this Act; and 6        (10) an acknowledgment that the Department will be 7    permitted to inspect the premises and records of the 8    applicant as to the items and in the manner prescribed in 9    this Act. 10    Section 20. Accreditation; licensure; renewal; fees; 11penalties; enforcement. 12    (a) An entity may not act as a non-transplant anatomical 13donation organization in this State unless the entity is 14accredited and licensed by the Department as a non-transplant 15anatomical donation organization. The entity shall apply in 16writing to the Department on a form specified by the Director, 17which shall include all information requested in the 18application, and shall pay the fees prescribed by the 19Department by rule. 20    (b) The Director shall grant a license to an entity if: 21        (1) the organization is accredited by a nationally 22    recognized accrediting agency that is approved by the 23    Department and maintains full accreditation with the 24    accrediting agency; and 25        (2) the entity meets other requirements prescribed by   SB0087- 9 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    the Department by rule. 2    (c) Each non-transplant anatomical donation organization 3applying for a license or license renewal shall pay all 4applicable fees as prescribed by the Department by rule. All 5fees collected for the license and license renewal of 6non-transplant anatomical donation organizations shall be 7deposited into the Public Health Licensing Fund, a special 8fund created in the State treasury, to be used by the 9Department for the administration and enforcement of this Act. 10    (d) The Director may sanction, impose civil penalties on, 11suspend the license of, or revoke the license of a 12non-transplant anatomical donation organization and may 13sanction or impose civil penalties on any person who is an 14owner, officer, agent, or employee of a non-transplant 15anatomical donation organization if the person is in or 16continues to be in violation of this Act or rules adopted by 17the Department under this Act. 18    (e) Any person or entity operating as a non-transplant 19anatomical donation organization without proper accreditation 20or licensure in this State shall be subject to criminal 21prosecution and civil penalties as provided under Section 85 22and any applicable rules. 23    Section 25. Other fees. 24    (a) The Department shall establish a fee for licensure 25under Section 10 and renewal under Section 30.   SB0087- 10 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    (b) The Department shall determine the amount of licensing 2fees under this Act, taking into consideration, among other 3things, the projected implementation, enforcement, and 4inspection costs associated with this Act. 5    (c) Every fine accruing from a conviction under this Act 6shall be paid into the common school fund of the county in 7which the offense was committed. 8    Section 30. License renewal. The Department shall require 9that the license of an applicant be renewed by the applicant 10every 2 years. 11    Section 35. Change of information. 12    (a) Not later than 30 days after any change of any 13information listed under Section 15, an applicant or licensee 14shall notify the Department of the change in writing as 15prescribed by the Department. 16    (b) A licensee shall notify the Department in writing at 17least 30 calendar days before the date of: 18        (1) termination of operation, including, but not 19    limited to, the proposed termination date and the address 20    and contact information for the location where the 21    non-transplant anatomical donation organization records 22    will be retained, if applicable; 23        (2) a proposed modification that alters the area for 24    tissue recovery, if applicable;   SB0087- 11 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1        (3) a change in the non-transplant anatomical donation 2    organization's legal name; 3        (4) a change in the legal name of a licensee, 4    including the licensee's new name; and 5        (5) a change in the address of the non-transplant 6    anatomical donation organization, including the new 7    address. 8    (c) A licensee shall notify the Department in writing no 9later than 30 calendar days after the date of: 10        (1) a change in the non-transplant anatomical donation 11    organization's email address or mailing address, including 12    the new email address or mailing address of the 13    non-transplant anatomical donation organization; 14        (2) a change in the email address or telephone number 15    of the licensee, including the new email address or 16    telephone number; 17        (3) a change in an administrator or medical director, 18    including his or her name and email address; and 19        (4) a change in the name or contact information of an 20    officer affiliated with the licensee, including the name 21    and contact information of the new officer. 22    (d) If the Department receives notification of termination 23of operation, the Department shall void the licensee's license 24to operate a non-transplant anatomical donation organization 25on the termination date specified by the licensee. 26    (e) If the Department receives notification of a proposed   SB0087- 12 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1modification that alters the area for tissue recovery, the 2Department: 3        (1) may conduct an inspection of the premises; and 4        (2) shall issue to the licensee an amended license 5    that incorporates the modification and retains the 6    expiration date of the existing license, if the 7    non-transplant anatomical donation organization is in 8    compliance. 9    (f) If the Department receives a notification of a legal 10name change for a non-transplant anatomical donation 11organization, the Department shall issue to the licensee an 12amended license showing the licensee's changed legal name. 13    (g) If the Department receives notice of a change in the 14legal name of a licensee, the Department shall void the 15licensee's license to operate and issue a new license to 16operate with the licensee's changed legal name. 17    (h) If the Department receives notice for a change in the 18address of a non-transplant anatomical donation organization, 19the Department shall require and review an amended application 20for a license. 21    (i) An individual or business organization planning to 22assume operation of an existing non-transplant anatomical 23donation organization shall obtain a new license before 24beginning operation. 25    Section 40. Denial; suspension; revocation; enforcement.   SB0087- 13 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    (a) The Department may: 2        (1) deny a license; 3        (2) suspend or revoke a license; or 4        (3) assess a civil penalty against a licensee. 5    (b) The Department may deny an application or suspend or 6revoke a license to operate a non-transplant anatomical 7donation organization if: 8        (1) an applicant or licensee does not meet the 9    application requirements; 10        (2) a licensee does not comply with any statutory 11    requirements or requirements of the Department; 12        (3) a licensee does not correct a deficiency 13    identified during an inspection according to the plan of 14    correction; 15        (4) an applicant or licensee provides false or 16    misleading information as part of an application or 17    inspection; or 18        (5) the nature or number of violations revealed by any 19    type of inspection or investigation of a non-transplant 20    anatomical donation organization pose a direct risk to the 21    life, health, or safety of individuals on the premises or 22    the public at large. 23    (c) In determining which action is appropriate, the 24Department may consider: 25        (1) repeated violations of statutes or rules; 26        (2) a pattern of violations;   SB0087- 14 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1        (3) the severity of violations; and 2        (4) the number of violations. 3    (d) The Department may suspend or revoke a non-transplant 4anatomical donation organization's license if the Department 5receives notice from the organization's accrediting body that 6the organization's accreditation has been suspended or 7revoked. An applicant or licensee may seek administrative 8review of the Department's determination. 9    Section 45. Inspections. The Department shall inspect a 10licensee's premises at least annually and any time after it 11receives a complaint or notice of a violation. 12    Section 50. Universal donor consent form; non-transplant 13anatomical donation. The Department shall create a universal 14donor consent form that allows a donor, the donor's family, or 15responsible authorizing agent to consent to non-transplant 16anatomical donation. 17        (1) The universal donor consent form shall include: 18            (A) the name of the donor and name of the donor's 19        family member or responsible authorizing agent, if 20        applicable; 21            (B) the contact information for donor, donor's 22        family, or responsible authorizing agent; 23            (C) the definitions of "education" and "research" 24        as provided in Section 5 of this Act;   SB0087- 15 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1            (D) the specific use consented to by the donor, 2        donor's family, or responsible authorizing agent of 3        the non-transplant anatomical material; 4            (E) uses of non-transplant anatomical material 5        that the donor, donor's family, or responsible 6        authorizing agent does not consent to; 7            (F) the end user or list of end users the donor, 8        donor's family, or authorizing agent consents to; 9            (G) a description of how, if the specific use 10        consented to by the donor, donor's family, or 11        responsible authorizing agent cannot be executed, the 12        donor's family or responsible authorizing agent shall 13        be contacted to execute secondary specific use consent 14        in accordance with the procedure provided in Section 15        60 of this Act; 16            (H) the contact information for the individual 17        with the authority to execute secondary specific use 18        consent; 19            (I) an explanation of how remains would be 20        returned, if applicable; 21            (J) the name, phone number, and license number for 22        the arranger; 23            (K) a statement that provides the donor, donor's 24        family, or responsible authorizing agent with 25        information regarding who to direct questions to; 26            (L) a statement that the non-transplant anatomical   SB0087- 16 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1        material will be treated with dignity at all times; 2        and 3            (M) a statement that the non-transplant anatomical 4        material may require international export to an end 5        user; and 6        (2) The universal donor consent form shall direct a 7    potential donor, the donor's family, or responsible 8    authorizing agent to websites that: 9            (A) answer frequently asked questions; 10            (B) allow a potential donor, the donor's family, 11        or responsible authorizing agent to verify whether a 12        specific non-transplant anatomical donation 13        organization holds a valid license with the 14        Department; and 15            (C) provide a resource to contact if the donor, 16        the donor's family, or responsible authorizing agent 17        alleges a violation of this Act. 18    Section 55. Specific use. 19    (a) The Department shall establish rules, regarding the 20donor's, donor's family's, or responsible authorizing agent's 21consented specific use of the non-transplant anatomical 22material, in accordance with the procedures provided for in 23this Section. 24    (b) When the donor, donor's family, or responsible 25authorizing agent consent to the gift of a non-transplant   SB0087- 17 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1anatomical donation, the donor, donor's family, or responsible 2authorizing agent shall be provided the opportunity to consent 3to the specific use of the non-transplant anatomical material. 4    (c) On the universal donor consent form, the donor, 5donor's family, or responsible authorizing agent shall be 6permitted to consent to the non-transplant anatomical donation 7for the following purposes: 8        (1) education purposes, including, but not limited to, 9    the training of new doctors; 10        (2) research purposes, including, but not limited to, 11    military advancements, vehicle safety, specific medical 12    research such as curing a specified ailment held by the 13    donor; or 14        (3) a specific education or research purpose. 15    (d) On the universal donor consent form, the donor, 16donor's family, or responsible authorizing agent shall be 17permitted to specify that the donor, donor's family, or 18responsible authorizing agent does not consent to the 19non-transplant anatomical donation for the following purposes: 20        (1) education purposes, including, but not limited to, 21    the training of new doctors; or 22        (2) research purposes, including, but not limited to, 23    military advancements, vehicle safety, or specific medical 24    research such as curing a specified ailment held by the 25    donor; or26        (3) a specific education or research purpose.  SB0087- 18 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    (e) On the universal donor consent form, the donor, 2donor's family, or responsible authorizing agent shall be 3permitted to specify a primary end user who the donor, donor's 4family, or responsible authorizing agent consents may receive 5the donor's non-transplant anatomical material. The donor, 6donor's family, or responsible authorizing agent shall be 7permitted to specify a secondary end user who the donor, 8donor's family, or responsible authorizing agent consents may 9receive the donor's non-transplant anatomical material if the 10primary end user is unable to accept the non-transplant 11anatomical donation for any reason, including that the primary 12end user cannot satisfy the donor, donor's family, or 13responsible authorizing agent's consented purpose in 14subsections (c) and (d) of this Section. 15    (f) If the specific use, including the consented purpose 16and end user, that the donor, donor's family, or responsible 17authorizing agent has consented to cannot be satisfied for any 18reason, the Department shall establish rules that require a 19licensee under this Act to contact the donor, donor's family, 20or responsible authorizing agent to execute secondary specific 21use consent in accordance with Section 60 of this Act. At this 22time, the licensee is required to notify the donor's family or 23responsible authorizing agent that if the consented secondary 24specific use cannot be satisfied, the donor's family or 25responsible authorizing agent is responsible for final 26disposition as the donation will not be accepted.   SB0087- 19 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    (g) If the licensee can honor the secondary specific use 2consented to by the donor's family or responsible authorizing 3agent, the licensee may transfer the non-transplant anatomical 4material to the end user. 5    (h) If the licensee cannot satisfy the secondary specific 6use consented to by the donor's family or responsible 7authorizing agent, the licensee may not transfer the 8non-transplant anatomical material to an end user. The 9licensee shall preserve the decedent's body and no donation 10shall be made. 11    Section 60. Secondary specific use consent. 12    (a) The Department shall establish rules regarding the 13donor's, donor's family's, or responsible authorizing agent's 14secondary specific use consent of the non-transplant 15anatomical material, in accordance with the procedures 16provided for in this Section. 17    (b) If the specific use, including the consented purpose 18and end user, that the donor, donor's family, or responsible 19authorizing agent has consented to cannot be satisfied for any 20reason, the donor's family or responsible authorizing agent 21shall be given an opportunity from the licensee to provide 22secondary specific use consent. 23    (c) A licensee shall notify the donor's family or 24responsible authorizing agent that the specific use consented 25to in the universal donor consent form cannot be satisfied.   SB0087- 20 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1The licensee may provide the donor's family or responsible 2authorizing agent with options for secondary specific use 3consent based on the current demand for non-transplant 4anatomical material for specific uses and specific end users. 5The licensee may provide the donor's family or responsible 6authorizing agent with the ability to provide secondary 7specific use consent for any education or research purpose to 8any end user. The licensee shall notify the donor's family or 9responsible authorizing agent that if the secondary specific 10use consented to by the donor's family or responsible 11authorizing agent cannot be satisfied, the licensee shall 12preserve the body and no donation shall be made. 13    (d) If the licensee can honor the secondary specific use 14consented to by the donor's family or responsible authorizing 15agent, the licensee may transfer the non-transplant anatomical 16material to the end user. 17    (e) If the licensee cannot satisfy the secondary specific 18use consented to by donor's family or responsible authorizing 19agent, the licensee may not transfer the non-transplant 20anatomical material to an end user. The licensee shall 21preserve the decedent's body and no donation shall be made. 22    Section 65. Donor records. 23    (a) A non-transplant anatomical donation organization 24shall maintain a legible, reproducible record for each donor 25from whom it releases non-transplant anatomical material for   SB0087- 21 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1at least 10 years after the date of final disposition. 2    (b) To ensure traceability of a non-transplant anatomical 3donation and non-transplant anatomical material, a 4non-transplant anatomical donation organization shall: 5        (1) document each procedure performed on a 6    non-transplant anatomical donation and non-transplant 7    anatomical material related to processing and storing 8    non-transplant anatomical donations and non-transplant 9    anatomical material; 10        (2) for each document created under paragraph (1), 11    include: 12            (A) the donor's unique identifier;13            (B) the date, time, and location for each 14        procedure completed; and 15            (C) the name of the technician who performed the 16        procedure; and 17        (3) submit or have a contracted funeral home submit 18    information required to register the death of a 19    non-transplant anatomical donation within 7 calendar days 20    after receiving the non-transplant anatomical donation, if 21    applicable. 22    (c) A donor record shall be: 23        (1) confidential; 24        (2) kept in a location with controlled access; 25        (3) stored in a manner to prevent unauthorized access; 26    and   SB0087- 22 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1        (4) maintained in a manner to preserve the donor 2    record's completeness and accuracy. 3    (d) A donor record shall include at least the following: 4        (1) donor information that includes: 5            (A) the donor's name; 6            (B) the donor's unique identifier; 7            (C) the donor's date of birth and date of death; 8        and 9            (D) the name and contact information of the person 10        responsible for a donor's anatomical gift, if 11        applicable;12        (2) an executed universal consent form that contains 13    the consented to specific use of the non-transplant 14    anatomical material; 15        (3) a secondary specific use consent, if applicable; 16        (4) a document of authorization, which is a legal 17    record of the gift, to take place postmortem, permitting 18    and defining the scope of the postmortem acquisition and 19    use of non-transplant anatomical material for education 20    and research, signed or otherwise recorded by the 21    authorizing person; 22        (5) a document of anatomical gift, which is the 23    donor's legal record of the gift of non-transplant 24    anatomical material permitting and defining the scope of 25    the postmortem acquisition and use of non-transplant 26    anatomical material for education and research;   SB0087- 23 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1        (6) an authorization of gift, which must be signed or 2    otherwise recorded by an individual authorized by law to 3    make a gift during the donor's lifetime; 4        (7) the donor's death record; 5        (8) the human remains release form, if applicable; 6        (9) information for a death record, if applicable for 7    transporting human remains into the State; 8        (10) a disposition transit permit, if applicable; 9        (11) a medical examiner's release of information, if 10    applicable; 11        (12) chain of custody record; 12        (13) medical records, including: 13            (A) a donor's physical assessment; 14            (B) a risk assessment questionnaire; 15            (C) pathology and laboratory testing and reports; 16            (D) physician summaries, if applicable; 17            (E) transfusion or infusion information, if 18        applicable; and 19            (F) plasma dilution calculations if applicable; 20        (14) information from the donor referral source; 21        (15) donor eligibility; 22        (16) a donor acceptability assessment; 23        (17) a physical assessment questionnaire; 24        (18) documentation related to distribution; 25        (19) serological results, if applicable; 26        (20) a cremation authorization document;   SB0087- 24 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1        (21) documentation related to non-transplant 2    anatomical material recovery, storage, and distribution 3    activities; 4        (22) final disposition documentation, including the 5    chain of custody record; and 6        (23) documentation of the suspected misuse or harm to 7    the donor, if any. 8    (e) A donor's record shall be accessible to: 9        (1) an agent legally authorized to have access, or an 10    individual designated at the time a donor gives consent; 11        (2) an individual appointed by a court or authorized 12    by State law; 13        (3) an individual of a non-transplant anatomical 14    donation organization as identified by policies and 15    procedures; 16        (4) an individual from an approved accrediting body, 17    if applicable; and 18        (5) an individual from the Department or other 19    regulatory agency authorized by State or federal laws or 20    rules adopted by the Department. 21    (f) Except for a donor record that must be maintained for a 22period of 10 years after final disposition, a non-transplant 23anatomical donation organization shall maintain documentation 24required under this Act for at least 3 years after the date of 25the documentation and shall provide copies of the 26documentation to the Department for review upon request.   SB0087- 25 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    Section 70. Recordkeeping.2    (a) A licensee shall compile or maintain a record for each 3case in which the licensee acquires a human body, human body 4part, or non-transplant anatomical donation. 5    (b) A record shall contain the following information and 6any additional information required by the Department: 7        (1) documentation that the donor has knowingly 8    consented to the transfer of the human body or human body 9    part, not for use in transplantation, for education, 10    research, or the advancement of medical, dental, or 11    mortuary science in accordance with all applicable laws 12    pertaining to the final disposition of human remains; 13        (2) documentation that the donor has been informed of 14    the obligation of the licensee as to the proper disposal 15    of the human body or human body part; 16        (3) the date and time of the donation or transfer from 17    the donor; 18        (4) the name of the person, including any trade or 19    business name, who transferred the human body or human 20    body part to the licensee, if applicable; 21        (5) the full name and most recent address of the 22    donor; 23        (6) a description of the human body or human body part 24    being acquired or transferred; 25        (7) the medical history of the donor, including the   SB0087- 26 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    autopsy report if any autopsy was conducted; 2        (8) the identity and address of each person who has 3    been in possession of the human body or human body part 4    prior to the registrant, including any funeral home, 5    coroner, hospital, organ procurement organization, or 6    tissue bank; 7        (9) documentation of the use and final disposition of 8    each human body or human body part by the licensee; 9        (10) documentation of the name and address of each 10    person to whom the licensee transfers the human body or 11    human body part; and 12        (11) the implementation and maintenance of protocols 13    and materials for procedures to properly screen end users. 14    (c) A licensee shall maintain the following records for 10 15years after the last date of tissue distribution: 16        (1) a copy of recorded consent of the donation 17    authorization; 18        (2) a copy of the donor's death certificate and 19    transit permit issued by the state where the death 20    occurred; 21        (3) a copy of the donor's physical assessment and risk 22    assessment questionnaire; 23        (4) a copy of the donor's serological results, if 24    applicable; and 25        (5) a copy of all documentation relating to tissue 26    recovery, storage, and distribution activities.   SB0087- 27 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    Section 75. Labeling and packaging. 2    (a) A licensee shall ensure that all human bodies and 3human body parts in the possession of, or transferred by, the 4licensee are labeled and packaged in accordance with this 5Section. 6    (b) Unless the Department specifies otherwise by rule, all 7anatomical material in a licensee's possession shall be 8affixed with a unique identifier. Each body part, organ, or 9tissue of the deceased that is separated from the body shall 10have its own additional identification that corresponds to the 11unique identifier of the deceased. 12    (c) A licensee shall ensure the unique identifier affixed 13to the anatomical materials or the packaging of the anatomical 14materials corresponds to the donor's file, which includes the 15following information: 16        (1) the proper name of the donor; 17        (2) a description of the contents of the package 18    indicating whether it is a human body or human body parts, 19    including a list of all human body parts; 20        (3) the name, address, and license and registration 21    number of the person transferring the human body or human 22    body part; 23        (4) the tissue types of the human body or human body 24    part; 25        (5) the cause of death of the donor, if applicable and   SB0087- 28 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    known; 2        (6) serological test results, if any results exist; 3        (7) any known infectious disease agents of the human 4    body or human body part; 5        (8) a statement about the use of personal protective 6    equipment and universal precautions when handling a human 7    body or human body part as required by law; and 8        (9) the statement "not for transplantation". 9    (d) Unless the Department specifies otherwise by rule, 10each human body or human body part under this Section shall be 11wrapped and packaged in a manner that: 12        (1) mitigates potential contamination and cross 13    contamination; 14        (2) mitigates potential safety hazards; 15        (3) is sealed to prevent leakage; and 16        (4) ensures the integrity of the human body or human 17    body part. 18    (e) The Department shall enforce the unique identifier 19requirement on all licensees under its jurisdiction that are 20required to fulfill this requirement. 21    Section 80. Final disposition. A licensee shall ensure the 22proper final disposition of a human body, human body part, or 23non-transplant anatomical material, in accordance with 24applicable federal and State law, by: 25        (1) returning the human body, human body part,   SB0087- 29 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    non-transplant anatomical material, or cremains to the 2    donor's family or responsible authorizing agent of the 3    donor within a time frame designated by the non-transplant 4    anatomical donation organization at the time donation is 5    established; 6        (2) carrying out the final disposition of the human 7    body or human body part as set forth in Section 4 of the 8    Cadaver Act; or 9        (3) if the licensee is releasing the human body or 10    human body part to another institution, contracting with 11    the institution to assume the obligations described in 12    this Act. 13    Section 85. Violations. 14    (a) Any person, entity, officer, or administrator who 15violates a requirement of this Act shall be guilty of a Class 4 16felony. 17    (b) The Department may suspend or revoke the license of 18any licensee found to be in violation of this Act. 19    (c) It is a violation of this Act for any person or entity 20to alter or falsify any information on a label required under 21Section 75. 22    Section 90. General responsibilities. 23    (a) A licensee shall provide a copy of a renewed 24accreditation to the Department within 30 calendar days after   SB0087- 30 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1the date of issuance. 2    (b) A licensee shall ensure that a non-transplant 3anatomical donation organization facility is in a building 4that provides a separate and designated area for tissue 5recovery. 6    (c) A licensee shall ensure policies and procedures are 7established, documented, and implemented that cover: 8        (1) labeling; 9        (2) packaging, including a packaging insert form that 10    discloses the disease status of tissue to end users; 11        (3) transport; 12        (4) distribution; and 13        (5) final disposition. 14    Section 95. General plant standards; environmental 15services. A licensee shall ensure that a non-transplant 16anatomical donation organization: 17        (1) has preparation rooms that: 18            (A) are maintained in a clean and sanitary 19        condition at all times; 20            (B) are only used for examining and preparing a 21        non-transplant anatomical donation; 22            (C) contain equipment, instruments, and supplies 23        necessary for examining and preparing a non-transplant 24        anatomical donation and are disinfected or sterilized, 25        as applicable, after each use to protect the health   SB0087- 31 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1        and safety of technicians and personnel members; 2            (D) have sanitary flooring, drainage, and 3        ventilation; 4            (E) have proper and convenient receptacles for 5        refuse, bandages, and all other waste materials; and 6            (F) are thoroughly cleansed and disinfected with a 7        1% solution of chlorinated soda, or other suitable and 8        effective disinfectant, immediately after examining 9        and preparing each non-transplant anatomical material; 10        and 11        (2) has equipment at the non-transplant anatomical 12    donation organization that is: 13            (A) sufficient to support the service; 14            (B) maintained in working condition; 15            (C) maintained in a clean and sanitary condition; 16            (D) used according to the manufacturer's 17        recommendations; 18            (E) if used during an examination or preparation 19        of a non-transplant anatomical donation, cleaned and 20        sanitized after every use; and 21            (F) if applicable, tested and calibrated according 22        to the manufacturer's recommendations or, if there are 23        no manufacturer's recommendations, according to 24        policies and procedures approved by the Department. 25    Section 100. Transportation standards.   SB0087- 32 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    (a) If a non-transplant anatomical donation organization 2owns and maintains a vehicle for transporting non-transplant 3anatomical material, an administrator shall ensure that the 4vehicle is: 5        (1) not used for a purpose other than transporting 6    non-transplant anatomical donations and non-transplant 7    anatomical material or conducting non-transplant 8    anatomical donation organization business; 9        (2) only operated by a procurement organization 10    technician or designated individual authorized to 11    transport non-transplant anatomical donations or 12    non-transplant anatomical material; 13        (3) maintained in clean and sanitary condition; and 14        (4) locked and secured at all times during transport 15    of non-transplant anatomical donations or non-transplant 16    anatomical material. 17    (b) If using a vehicle other than the vehicle described 18under subsection (a) for transporting a non-transplant 19anatomical donation or non-transplant anatomical material, an 20administrator shall ensure that the vehicle: 21        (1) is properly equipped for the transportation of 22    non-transplant anatomical material; 23        (2) is compliant with all State and federal laws and 24    rules pertaining to transporting humans remains; and 25        (3) if transport is by air, complies with applicable 26    standards established by the International Air Transport   SB0087- 33 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    Association and Transportation Security Administration. 2    (c) An administrator shall ensure that non-transplant 3anatomical donations and non-transplant anatomical material 4transported into the State have information of death 5documentation prior to transport. 6    Section 105. End user. 7    (a) A licensee shall establish, document, and implement 8policies and procedures to properly screen an end user that 9include: 10        (1) a written request for non-transplant anatomical 11    material, including: 12            (A) the name, address, and affiliation of 13        educators or research institutions accepting 14        responsibility for the acceptance, use, and final 15        disposition of the non-transplant anatomical material; 16            (B) a description of the intended use; 17            (C) the date and the approximate duration of 18        non-transplant anatomical material use; 19            (D) a description of the venue in which the 20        non-transplant anatomical material will be used and 21        the security measures for the safe and ethical 22        utilization of the venue; 23            (E) an assurance that precautions will be used 24        when handling non-transplant anatomical material; 25            (F) the proposed final disposition of the   SB0087- 34 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1        non-transplant anatomical material; 2            (G) an agreement to comply with the licensee's 3        policies, if applicable; 4            (H) an outline of proposed materials to be 5        disseminated in connection with the use of 6        non-transplant anatomical material, if applicable; and 7            (I) other supporting documentation that is 8        relevant to the request; and 9        (2) the criteria for approving requested 10    non-transplant anatomical material for use, including: 11            (A) the acceptability of the educator and 12        researcher for non-transplant anatomical material 13        utilization; 14            (B) the appropriateness of the intended use; 15            (C) the type of venue in which the non-transplant 16        anatomical material will be used; a licensee shall 17        determine that a hotel or other building held out to 18        the public to be a place where lodging is offered for 19        consideration to travelers and guests is not a 20        suitable venue for the use of non-transplant 21        anatomical material. 22            (D) the proposed final disposition of the 23        non-transplant anatomical material, unless returned to 24        the non-transplant anatomical donation organization; 25        and 26            (E) proposed research materials.   SB0087- 35 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    (b) A licensee shall establish, document, and implement a 2procedure that allows end users to request an exceptional 3release of non-transplant anatomical material. 4    Section 900. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1030 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)7    Sec. 5.1030. The Public Health Licensing Fund. 8    Section 905. The Vital Records Act is amended by changing 9Sections 1 and 21.7 as follows: 10    (410 ILCS 535/1)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 73-1)11    Sec. 1. As used in this Act, unless the context otherwise 12requires: 13    (1) "Vital records" means records of births, deaths, fetal 14deaths, marriages, dissolution of marriages, and data related 15thereto.16    (2) "System of vital records" includes the registration, 17collection, preservation, amendment, and certification of 18vital records, and activities related thereto.19    (3) "Filing" means the presentation of a certificate, 20report, or other record provided for in this Act, of a birth, 21death, fetal death, adoption, marriage, or dissolution of 22marriage, for registration by the Office of Vital Records.  SB0087- 36 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    (4) "Registration" means the acceptance by the Office of 2Vital Records and the incorporation in its official records of 3certificates, reports, or other records provided for in this 4Act, of births, deaths, fetal deaths, adoptions, marriages, or 5dissolution of marriages.6    (5) "Live birth" means the complete expulsion or 7extraction from its mother of a product of human conception, 8irrespective of the duration of pregnancy, which after such 9separation breathes or shows any other evidence of life such 10as beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or 11definite movement of voluntary muscles, whether or not the 12umbilical cord has been cut or the placenta is attached.13    (6) "Fetal death" means death prior to the complete 14expulsion or extraction from the uterus of a product of human 15conception, irrespective of the duration of pregnancy, and 16which is not due to an abortion as defined in Section 1-10 of 17the Reproductive Health Act. The death is indicated by the 18fact that after such separation the fetus does not breathe or 19show any other evidence of life such as beating of the heart, 20pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of 21voluntary muscles.22    (7) "Dead body" means a lifeless human body or parts of 23such body or bones thereof from the state of which it may 24reasonably be concluded that death has occurred.25    (8) "Final disposition" means the burial, cremation, or 26other disposition of a dead human body or fetus or parts   SB0087- 37 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1thereof.2    (9) "Physician" means a person licensed to practice 3medicine in Illinois or any other state.4    (10) "Institution" means any establishment, public or 5private, which provides in-patient medical, surgical, or 6diagnostic care or treatment, or nursing, custodial, or 7domiciliary care to 2 or more unrelated individuals, or to 8which persons are committed by law.9    (11) "Department" means the Department of Public Health of 10the State of Illinois.11    (12) "Director" means the Director of the Illinois 12Department of Public Health.13    (13) "Licensed health care professional" means a person 14licensed to practice as a physician, advanced practice 15registered nurse, or physician assistant in Illinois or any 16other state.17    (14) "Licensed mental health professional" means a person 18who is licensed or registered to provide mental health 19services by the Department of Financial and Professional 20Regulation or a board of registration duly authorized to 21register or grant licenses to persons engaged in the practice 22of providing mental health services in Illinois or any other 23state. 24    (15) "Intersex condition" means a condition in which a 25person is born with a reproductive or sexual anatomy or 26chromosome pattern that does not fit typical definitions of   SB0087- 38 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1male or female. 2    (16) "Homeless person" means an individual who meets the 3definition of "homeless" under Section 103 of the federal 4McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. 11302) or an 5individual residing in any of the living situations described 6in 42 U.S.C. 11434a(2). 7    (17) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means: (i) an 8advanced practice registered nurse with full practice 9authority; or (ii) an advanced practice registered nurse with 10a collaborative agreement with a physician who has delegated 11the completion of death certificates.12    (18) "Certifying health care professional" means a 13physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice 14registered nurse.15    (19) "Physician assistant" means a physician assistant who 16practices in accordance with a written collaborative agreement 17that includes the completion of death certificates. 18    (20) "Unique identifier" means providing the deceased with 19individual identification, through tagging, numbering, QR 20code, or other individualized means, that is affixed to the 21dead body, the body bag, and any body part, organ, or tissue 22separated from the deceased to be used in non-transplant 23anatomical donation in order to prevent misidentification of 24human remains as described in the Consensual Non-Transplant 25Donation Regulation Act. 26(Source: P.A. 101-13, eff. 6-12-19; 102-257, eff. 1-1-22;   SB0087- 39 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1102-844, eff. 1-1-23.) 2    (410 ILCS 535/21.7)3    Sec. 21.7. Temporary removal of a dead body. No permit for 4transportation signed by the local registrar is required prior 5to transporting a dead human body out of the State of Illinois, 6at the direction of a federally designated organ procurement 7organization, for the purpose of organ or tissue donation. The 8dead human body being transported for the purpose of organ or 9tissue donation shall be accompanied by a self-issued permit 10in accordance with rules adopted by the Department of Public 11Health. The dead human body being transported shall have the 12deceased's unique identifier affixed to the deceased, the body 13bag, and any body part, organ, or tissue separated from the 14deceased to be used in non-transplant anatomical donation. 15This self-issued permit shall be completed by an 16Illinois-licensed funeral director and embalmer or 17Illinois-licensed funeral director and shall serve as 18notification to the county medical examiner or coroner of the 19jurisdiction or county in which the death occurred that the 20dead human body is being transported out of Illinois for a 21period not to exceed 36 hours. This Section applies only to 22instances in which the dead human body is to be returned to 23Illinois prior to disposition. This Section does not affect 24any rights or responsibilities held by county medical 25examiners or coroners under the Local Governmental and   SB0087- 40 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1Governmental Employees Tort Immunity Act. The Department of 2Public Health shall adopt rules to implement this Section.3(Source: P.A. 99-262, eff. 1-1-16.) 4    Section 910. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-117 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-117)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-117)7    Sec. 6-117. Records to be kept by the Secretary of State. 8    (a) The Secretary of State shall file every application 9for a license or permit accepted under this Chapter, and shall 10maintain suitable indexes thereof. The records of the 11Secretary of State shall indicate the action taken with 12respect to such applications.13    (b) The Secretary of State shall maintain appropriate 14records of all licenses and permits refused, cancelled, 15disqualified, revoked, or suspended and of the revocation, 16suspension, and disqualification of driving privileges of 17persons not licensed under this Chapter, and such records 18shall note the reasons for such action.19    (c) The Secretary of State shall maintain appropriate 20records of convictions reported under this Chapter. Records of 21conviction may be maintained in a computer processible medium.22    (d) The Secretary of State may also maintain appropriate 23records of any crash reports received.24    (e) The Secretary of State shall also maintain appropriate   SB0087- 41 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1records of any disposition of supervision or records relative 2to a driver's referral to a driver remedial or rehabilitative 3program, as required by the Secretary of State or the courts. 4Such records shall only be available for use by the Secretary, 5the driver licensing administrator of any other state, law 6enforcement agencies, the courts, and the affected driver or, 7upon proper verification, such affected driver's attorney.8    (f) The Secretary of State shall also maintain or contract 9to maintain appropriate records of all photographs and 10signatures obtained in the process of issuing any driver's 11license, permit, or identification card. The record shall be 12confidential and shall not be disclosed except to those 13entities listed under Section 6-110.1 of this Code.14    (g) The Secretary of State may establish a First Person 15Consent organ and tissue donor registry in compliance with 16subsection (b-1) of Section 5-20 of the Illinois Anatomical 17Gift Act, as follows:18        (1) The Secretary shall offer, to each applicant for 19    issuance or renewal of a driver's license or 20    identification card who is 16 years of age or older, the 21    opportunity to have his or her name included in the First 22    Person Consent organ and tissue donor registry. The 23    Secretary must advise the applicant or licensee that he or 24    she is under no compulsion to have his or her name included 25    in the registry. An individual who agrees to having his or 26    her name included in the First Person Consent organ and   SB0087- 42 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    tissue donor registry has given full legal consent to the 2    donation of any of his or her organs or tissue upon his or 3    her death. A brochure explaining this method of executing 4    an anatomical gift must be given to each applicant for 5    issuance or renewal of a driver's license or 6    identification card. The brochure must advise the 7    applicant or licensee (i) that he or she is under no 8    compulsion to have his or her name included in this 9    registry and (ii) that he or she may wish to consult with 10    family, friends, or clergy before doing so.11        (2) The Secretary of State may establish additional 12    methods by which an individual may have his or her name 13    included in the First Person Consent organ and tissue 14    donor registry.15        (2.5) Not later than 2 years after the effective date 16    of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the 17    Secretary of State shall provide each applicant under this 18    Section the universal donor consent form established by 19    the Department of Public Health in Section 50 of the 20    Consensual Non-Transplant Donation Regulation Act. 21        (3) When an individual has agreed to have his or her 22    name included in the First Person Consent organ and tissue 23    donor registry, the Secretary of State shall note that 24    agreement in the First Person consent organ and tissue 25    donor registry. Representatives of federally designated 26    organ procurement agencies and tissue banks and the   SB0087- 43 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    offices of Illinois county coroners and medical examiners 2    may inquire of the Secretary of State whether a potential 3    organ donor's name is included in the First Person Consent 4    organ and tissue donor registry, and the Secretary of 5    State may provide that information to the representative.6        (4) An individual may withdraw his or her consent to 7    be listed in the First Person Consent organ and tissue 8    donor registry maintained by the Secretary of State by 9    notifying the Secretary of State in writing, or by any 10    other means approved by the Secretary, of the individual's 11    decision to have his or her name removed from the 12    registry.13        (5) The Secretary of State may undertake additional 14    efforts, including education and awareness activities, to 15    promote organ and tissue donation.16        (6) In the absence of gross negligence or willful 17    misconduct, the Secretary of State and his or her 18    employees are immune from any civil or criminal liability 19    in connection with an individual's consent to be listed in 20    the organ and tissue donor registry. 21(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.) 22    Section 915. The Illinois Anatomical Gift Act is amended 23by changing Sections 1-10, 5-5, 5-12, 5-20, 5-25, 5-27, and 245-47 and by adding Section 5-6 as follows:   SB0087- 44 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    (755 ILCS 50/1-10)  (was 755 ILCS 50/2)2    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. In this Act: 3    "Close friend" means any person 18 years of age or older 4who has exhibited special care and concern for the decedent 5and who presents an affidavit to the decedent's attending 6physician, or the hospital administrator or his or her 7designated representative, stating that he or she (i) was a 8close friend of the decedent, (ii) is willing and able to 9authorize the donation, and (iii) maintained such regular 10contact with the decedent as to be familiar with the 11decedent's health and social history, and religious and moral 12beliefs. The affidavit must also state facts and circumstances 13that demonstrate that familiarity.14    "Death" means, for the purposes of the Act, when, 15according to accepted medical standards, there is (i) an 16irreversible cessation of circulatory and respiratory 17functions; or (ii) an irreversible cessation of all functions 18of the entire brain, including the brain stem. 19    "Decedent" means a deceased individual and includes a 20stillborn infant or fetus. 21    "Disinterested witness" means a witness other than the 22spouse, child, parent, sibling, grandchild, grandparent, or 23guardian of the individual who makes, amends, revokes, or 24refuses to make an anatomical gift, or another adult who 25exhibited special care and concern for the individual. The 26term does not include a person to whom an anatomical gift could   SB0087- 45 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1pass under Section 5-12.2    "Document of gift" means a donor card or other record used 3to make an anatomical gift. The term includes a donor 4registry.5    "Donee" means the individual designated by the donor as 6the intended recipient or an entity which receives the 7anatomical gift, including, but not limited to, a hospital; an 8accredited medical school, dental school, college, or 9university; an organ procurement organization; an eye bank; a 10tissue bank; for research or education, a non-transplant 11anatomic bank; or other appropriate person. 12    "Donor" means an individual whose body or part is the 13subject of an anatomical gift.14    "Hospital" means a hospital licensed, accredited or 15approved under the laws of any state; and includes a hospital 16operated by the United States government, a state, or a 17subdivision thereof, although not required to be licensed 18under state laws. 19    "Non-transplant anatomic bank" means any facility or 20program operating or providing services in this State that is 21accredited by the American Association of Tissue Banks and 22that is involved in procuring, furnishing, or distributing 23whole bodies or parts for the purpose of medical education. 24For purposes of this Section, a non-transplant anatomic bank 25operating under the auspices of a hospital, accredited medical 26school, dental school, college or university, or federally   SB0087- 46 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1designated organ procurement organization is not required to 2be accredited by the American Association of Tissue Banks. 3    "Non-transplant anatomical donation organization" means an 4entity that is licensed under the Consensual Non-Transplant 5Donation Regulation Act to engage in the recovery, screening, 6testing, processing, distribution, or storage of human bodies 7or body parts for purposes of education, research, or the 8advancement of medical, dental, or mortuary science. 9    "Organ" means a human kidney, liver, heart, lung, 10pancreas, small bowel, or other transplantable vascular body 11part as determined by the Organ Procurement and 12Transplantation Network, as periodically selected by the U.S. 13Department of Health and Human Services.14    "Organ procurement organization" means the organ 15procurement organization designated by the Secretary of the 16U.S. Department of Health and Human Services for the service 17area in which a hospital is located, or the organ procurement 18organization for which the Secretary of the U.S. Department of 19Health and Human Services has granted the hospital a waiver 20pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1320b-8(a). 21    "Part" means organs, tissues, eyes, bones, arteries, 22blood, other fluids and any other portions of a human body. 23    "Person" means an individual, corporation, government or 24governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, 25trust, partnership or association or any other legal entity. 26    "Physician" or "surgeon" means a physician or surgeon   SB0087- 47 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1licensed or authorized to practice medicine in all of its 2branches under the laws of any state. 3    "Procurement organization" means an organ procurement 4organization or a tissue bank. 5    "Reasonably available for the giving of consent or 6refusal" means being able to be contacted by a procurement 7organization without undue effort and being willing and able 8to act in a timely manner consistent with existing medical 9criteria necessary for the making of an anatomical gift. 10    "Recipient" means an individual into whose body a donor's 11part has been or is intended to be transplanted. 12    "State" includes any state, district, commonwealth, 13territory, insular possession, and any other area subject to 14the legislative authority of the United States of America. 15    "Technician" means an individual trained and certified to 16remove tissue, by a recognized medical training institution in 17the State of Illinois. 18    "Tissue" means eyes, bones, heart valves, veins, skin, and 19any other portions of a human body excluding blood, blood 20products or organs. 21    "Tissue bank" means any facility or program operating in 22Illinois that is accredited by the American Association of 23Tissue Banks, the Eye Bank Association of America, or the 24Association of Organ Procurement Organizations and is involved 25in procuring, furnishing, donating, or distributing corneas, 26bones, or other human tissue for the purpose of injecting,   SB0087- 48 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1transfusing, or transplanting any of them into the human body 2or for the purpose of research or education. "Tissue bank" 3does not include a licensed blood bank. For the purposes of 4this Act, "tissue" does not include organs or blood or blood 5products. 6(Source: P.A. 98-172, eff. 1-1-14; 98-756, eff. 7-16-14.) 7    (755 ILCS 50/5-5)  (was 755 ILCS 50/3)8    Sec. 5-5. Persons who may execute an anatomical gift. 9    (a) An anatomical gift of a donor's body or part that is to 10be carried out upon the donor's death may be made during the 11life of the donor for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, 12research, or education by:13        (1) the donor, if the donor is an adult, an 14    emancipated minor, or 16 or 17 years of age and registered 15    in the First Person Consent organ and tissue donor 16    registry under subsection (g) of Section 6-117 of the 17    Illinois Vehicle Code if the First Person Consent was 18    executed prior to 2 years after the effective date of this 19    amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly; 20        (1.5) the donor, if the donor is an adult, an 21    emancipated minor, or 16 or 17 years of age and registered 22    in the First Person Consent organ and tissue donor 23    registry under subsection (g) of Section 6-117 of the 24    Illinois Vehicle Code and executed the universal donor 25    consent form in accordance with Section 50 of the   SB0087- 49 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    Consensual Non-Transplant Donation Regulation Act, if the 2    First Person Consent was executed later than 2 years after 3    the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 4    General Assembly; 5        (2) an agent of the donor, unless the power of 6    attorney for health care or other record prohibits the 7    agent from making an anatomical gift; 8        (3) a parent of the donor, if the donor is an 9    unemancipated minor; or 10        (4) the donor's guardian. 11    (b) If no gift has been executed under subsection (a), an 12anatomical gift of a decedent's body or part for the purpose of 13transplantation, therapy, research, or education may be made 14at the time of the decedent's death, or when death is imminent, 15by a member of the following classes of persons who is 16reasonably available for the giving of authorization or 17refusal, in the order of priority listed, when persons in 18prior classes are not available for the giving of 19authorization or refusal and in the absence of actual notice 20of contrary intentions by the decedent: 21        (1) an individual acting as the decedent's agent under 22    a power of attorney for health care; 23        (2) the guardian of the person of the decedent; 24        (3) the spouse or civil union partner of the decedent; 25        (4) an adult child of the decedent; 26        (5) a parent of the decedent;   SB0087- 50 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1        (6) an adult sibling of the decedent; 2        (7) an adult grandchild of the decedent; 3        (8) a grandparent of the decedent; 4        (9) a close friend of the decedent; 5        (10) the guardian of the estate of the decedent; and 6        (11) any other person authorized or under legal 7    obligation to dispose of the body. 8    (b-5) If there is more than one member of a class listed in 9item (2), (4), (5), (6), or (7) of subsection (b) of this 10Section entitled to make an anatomical gift, an anatomical 11gift may be made by a member of the class unless that member or 12a person to which the gift may pass under Section 5-12 knows of 13an objection by another member of the class. If an objection is 14known, the gift may be made only by a majority of the members 15of the class who are reasonably available for the giving of 16authorization or refusal. 17    (b-10) A person may not make an anatomical gift if, at the 18time of the decedent's death, a person in a higher priority 19class under subsection (b) of this Section is reasonably 20available for the giving of authorization or refusal. 21    (c) A gift of all or part of a body authorizes any blood or 22tissue test or minimally invasive examination necessary to 23assure medical acceptability of the gift for the purposes 24intended. The hospital shall, to the extent possible and in 25accordance with any agreement with the organ procurement 26organization, non-transplant anatomical donation   SB0087- 51 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1organization, or tissue bank, take measures necessary to 2maintain the medical suitability of the part until the 3procurement organization has had the opportunity to advise the 4applicable persons as set forth in this Act of the option to 5make an anatomical gift or has ascertained that the individual 6expressed a contrary intent and has so informed the hospital. 7The results of tests and examinations under this subsection 8shall be used or disclosed only for purposes of evaluating 9medical suitability for donation, to facilitate the donation 10process, and as required or permitted by existing law. 11    (d) The rights of the donee created by the gift are 12paramount to the rights of others except as provided by 13Section 5-45(d). 14    (e) If no gift has been executed under this Act, then no 15part of the decedent's body may be used for any purpose 16specified in this Act. 17(Source: P.A. 100-41, eff. 1-1-18.) 18    (755 ILCS 50/5-6 new)19    Sec. 5-6. Universal donor consent form. Two years after 20the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 21Assembly, the execution of a gift under this Act shall be 22accompanied by the universal donor consent form provided for 23in Section 50 of the Consensual Non-Transplant Donation 24Regulation Act to consent to non-transplant anatomical 25donation.   SB0087- 52 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    (755 ILCS 50/5-12)2    Sec. 5-12. Persons who may receive an anatomical gift; 3purpose of anatomical gift.4    (a) An anatomical gift may be made to the following 5persons named in the document of gift:6        (1) for research or education, a hospital; an 7    accredited medical school, dental school, college, or 8    university; an organ procurement organization; or other 9    appropriate person;10        (2) subject to subsection (b) of this Section, an 11    individual designated by the person making the anatomical 12    gift if the individual is the recipient of the part;13        (3) an eye bank or tissue bank; or14        (4) for research or education, a non-transplant 15    anatomical donation organization licensed by the 16    Department of Public Health anatomic bank.17    (b) If an anatomical gift to an individual under item (2) 18of subsection (a) of this Section cannot be transplanted into 19the individual, the part passes in accordance with subsection 20(g) of this Section unless there is an express, contrary 21indication by the person making the anatomical gift or the 22universal donor consent form provides the contrary indication.23    (c) If an anatomical gift of one or more specific parts or 24of all parts is made in a document of gift that does not name a 25person described in subsection (a) of this Section, but   SB0087- 53 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1identifies the purpose for which an anatomical gift may be 2used, the following rules apply:3        (1) If the part is an eye and the gift is for the 4    purpose of transplantation or therapy, the gift passes to 5    the appropriate eye bank.6        (2) If the part is tissue and the gift is for the 7    purpose of transplantation or therapy, the gift passes to 8    the appropriate tissue bank.9        (3) If the part is an organ and the gift is for the 10    purpose of transplantation or therapy, the gift passes to 11    the appropriate organ procurement organization as 12    custodian of the organ.13        (4) If the part is an organ, an eye, or tissue and the 14    gift is for the purpose of research or education, the gift 15    passes to the appropriate non-transplant anatomical 16    donation organization procurement organization.17    (d) For the purpose of subsection (c) of this Section, if 18there is more than one purpose of an anatomical gift set forth 19in the document of gift but the purposes are not set forth in 20any priority, and if the gift cannot be used for 21transplantation or therapy, the gift may be used for research 22or education, provided that the universal donor consent form 23does not stipulate a purpose to the contrary.24    (e) If an anatomical gift of one or more specific parts is 25made in a document of gift that does not name a person 26described in subsection (a) of this Section and does not   SB0087- 54 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1identify the purpose of the gift, the gift may be used only for 2transplantation or therapy or research, and the gift passes in 3accordance with subsection (g) of this Section.4    (f) If a document of gift specifies only a general intent 5to make an anatomical gift by words such as "donor", "organ 6donor", or "body donor", or by a symbol or statement of similar 7import, the gift may be used only for transplantation or 8therapy or research, and the gift passes in accordance with 9subsection (g) of this Section.10    (g) For purposes of subsections (b), (e), and (f) of this 11Section, the following rules apply:12        (1) If the part is an eye, the gift passes to the 13    appropriate eye bank.14        (2) If the part is tissue, the gift passes to the 15    appropriate tissue bank.16        (3) If the part is an organ, the gift passes to the 17    appropriate organ procurement organization or 18    non-transplant anatomical donation organization as 19    custodian of the organ.20    (h) An anatomical gift of an organ for transplantation or 21therapy, other than an anatomical gift under item (2) of 22subsection (a) of this Section, passes to the organ 23procurement organization as custodian of the organ.24    (i) If an anatomical gift does not pass under this Section 25or the decedent's body or part is not used for 26transplantation, therapy, research, or education, custody of   SB0087- 55 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1the body or part passes to the person under obligation to 2dispose of the body or part.3    (j) A person may not accept an anatomical gift if the 4person knows that the gift was not effectively made under 5Section 5-5 or subsection (e) or (e-5) of Section 5-20 or if 6the person knows that the decedent made a refusal under 7Section 5-43 that was not revoked.8    (k) Except as otherwise provided in item (2) of subsection 9(a) of this Section, nothing in this Act affects the 10allocation of organs for transplantation or therapy.11(Source: P.A. 98-172, eff. 1-1-14.) 12    (755 ILCS 50/5-20)  (was 755 ILCS 50/5)13    Sec. 5-20. Manner of executing anatomical gifts. 14    (a) A donor may make an anatomical gift:15        (1) by authorizing a statement or symbol indicating 16    that the donor has made an anatomical gift to be imprinted 17    on the donor's driver's license or identification card;18        (2) in a will;19        (3) during a terminal illness or injury of the donor, 20    by any form of communication addressed to at least 2 21    adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness; 22    or23        (4) as provided in subsection (b) and (b-1) of this 24    Section. 25    (b) A donor or other person authorized to make an   SB0087- 56 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1anatomical gift under subsection (a) of Section 5-5 may make a 2gift by a donor card or other record signed by the donor or 3other person making the gift or by authorizing that a 4statement or symbol indicating that the donor has made an 5anatomical gift be included on a donor registry. If the donor 6or other person is physically unable to sign a record, the 7record may be signed by another individual at the direction of 8the donor or other person and must:9        (1) be witnessed by at least 2 adults, at least one of 10    whom is a disinterested witness, who have signed at the 11    request of the donor or the other person; and12        (2) state that it has been signed and witnessed as 13    provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection (b).14    (b-1) A gift under Section 5-5 (a) may also be made by an 15individual consenting to have his or her name included in the 16First Person Consent organ and tissue donor registry 17maintained by the Secretary of State under Section 6-117 of 18the Illinois Vehicle Code. An individual's consent to have his 19or her name included in the First Person Consent organ and 20tissue donor registry constitutes full legal authority for the 21donation of any of his or her organs or tissue for purposes of 22transplantation, therapy, or research. Consenting to be 23included in the First Person Consent organ and tissue donor 24registry is effective without regard to the presence or 25signature of witnesses. 26    (b-5) Revocation, suspension, expiration, or cancellation   SB0087- 57 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1of a driver's license or identification card upon which an 2anatomical gift is indicated does not invalidate the gift.3    (b-7) Not later than 2 years after the effective date of 4this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the 5Secretary of State shall provide all donors with the universal 6donor consent form in accordance with Section 6-117 of the 7Illinois Vehicle Code. 8    (b-10) An anatomical gift made by will takes effect upon 9the donor's death whether or not the will is probated. 10Invalidation of the will after the donor's death does not 11invalidate the gift. 12    (c) The anatomical gift may be made to a specified donee or 13without specifying a donee. If the gift is made to a specified 14donee who is not available at the time and place of death, then 15if made for the purpose of transplantation, it shall be 16effectuated in accordance with Section 5-25. 17    (d) The donee or other person authorized to accept the 18gift pursuant to Section 5-12 may employ or authorize any 19qualified technician, surgeon, or physician to perform the 20recovery. 21    (e) A person authorized to make an anatomical gift under 22subsection (b) of Section 5-5 may make an anatomical gift by a 23document of gift signed by the person making the gift or by 24that person's oral communication that is electronically 25recorded or is contemporaneously reduced to a record and 26signed by the individual receiving the oral communication.   SB0087- 58 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    (e-5) An anatomical gift by a person authorized under 2subsection (b) of Section 5-5 may be amended or revoked orally 3or in a record by a member of a prior class who is reasonably 4available for the giving of authorization or refusal. If more 5than one member of the prior class is reasonably available for 6the giving of authorization or refusal, the gift made by a 7person authorized under subsection (b) of Section 5-5 may be:8        (1) amended only if a majority of the class members 9    reasonably available for the giving of authorization or 10    refusal agree to the amending of the gift; or11        (2) revoked only if a majority of the class members 12    reasonably available for the giving of authorization or 13    refusal agree to the revoking of the gift or if they are 14    equally divided as to whether to revoke the gift.15    (e-10) A revocation under subsection (e-5) is effective 16only if, before an incision has been made to remove a part from 17the donor's body or before invasive procedures have been 18commenced to prepare the recipient, the procurement 19organization, non-transplant anatomic bank, transplant 20hospital, or physician or technician knows of the revocation. 21    (f) When there is a suitable candidate for organ donation 22and a donation or consent to donate has not yet been given, 23procedures to preserve the decedent's body for possible organ 24and tissue donation may be implemented under the authorization 25of the applicable organ procurement organization, at its own 26expense, prior to making a donation request pursuant to   SB0087- 59 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1Section 5-25. If the organ procurement organization does not 2locate a person authorized to consent to donation or consent 3to donation is denied, then procedures to preserve the 4decedent's body shall be ceased and no donation shall be made. 5The organ procurement organization shall respect the religious 6tenets of the decedent, if known, such as a pause after death, 7before initiating preservation services. Nothing in this 8Section shall be construed to authorize interference with the 9coroner in carrying out an investigation or autopsy. 10(Source: P.A. 100-41, eff. 1-1-18.) 11    (755 ILCS 50/5-25)12    Sec. 5-25. Notification; authorization.13    (a) Each hospital in this State shall enter into 14agreements or affiliations with procurement organizations for 15coordination of procurement and use of anatomical gifts. 16Within 2 years after the effective date of this amendatory 17Act, each hospital in the State shall enter into agreements or 18affiliations with non-transplant anatomical donation 19organizations licensed by the Department of Public Health for 20the purposes of coordinating non-transplant anatomical 21donations. 22    (b) Hospitals shall proceed in accordance with the 23applicable requirements of 42 CFR 482.45 or any successor 24provisions of federal statute or regulation, as may be amended 25from time to time, with regard to collaboration with   SB0087- 60 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1procurement organizations to facilitate organ, tissue, and eye 2donation.3    In making a request for organ or tissue donation, the 4hospital or the hospital's federally designated organ 5procurement organization or tissue bank shall request any of 6the persons, in the order of priority stated in items (1) 7through (11) below, when persons in prior classes are not 8available and in the absence of (i) actual notice of contrary 9intentions by the decedent, (ii) actual notice of opposition 10by any member within the same priority class, and (iii) reason 11to believe that an anatomical gift is contrary to the 12decedent's religious beliefs, to authorize the gift of all or 13any part of the decedent's body for any purpose specified in 14Section 5-12:15        (1) an individual acting as the decedent's agent under 16    a power of attorney for health care;17        (2) the guardian of the person of the decedent; 18        (3) the spouse or civil union partner of the decedent; 19        (4) an adult child of the decedent; 20        (5) a parent of the decedent; 21        (6) an adult sibling of the decedent; 22        (7) an adult grandchild of the decedent; 23        (8) a grandparent of the decedent; 24        (9) a close friend of the decedent; 25        (10) the guardian of the estate of the decedent; and 26        (11) any other person authorized or under legal   SB0087- 61 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    obligation to dispose of the body.2    (c) (Blank).3    (d) (Blank). 4(Source: P.A. 98-172, eff. 1-1-14.) 5    (755 ILCS 50/5-27)  (was 755 ILCS 60/3.5)6    Sec. 5-27. Notification of patient; family rights and 7options after circulatory death.8    (a) In this Section, "donation after circulatory death" 9means the donation of organs from a patient whose death is 10declared based upon cardiopulmonary, and not neurological, 11criteria, following the implementation of the decision to 12withdraw life support.13    (b) If (i) a potential organ donor, or an individual given 14authority under subsection (b) of Section 5-25 to consent to 15an organ donation, expresses an interest in organ donation, 16(ii) there has not been a certification of brain death for the 17potential donor, and (iii) the potential donor is a patient at 18a hospital that does not allow donation after circulatory 19death, then the organ procurement organization shall inform 20the patient or the individual given authority to consent to 21organ donation that the hospital does not allow donation after 22circulatory death. 23    (c) In addition to providing oral notification, the organ 24procurement organization shall develop a written form that 25indicates to the patient or the individual given authority to   SB0087- 62 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1consent to organ donation, at a minimum, the following 2information: 3        (1) That the patient or the individual given authority 4    to consent to organ donation has received literature and 5    has been counseled by (representative's name) of the 6    (organ procurement organization name).7        (2) That all organ donation options have been 8    explained to the patient or the individual given authority 9    to consent to organ donation, including the option of 10    donation after circulatory death.11        (3) That the patient or the individual given authority 12    to consent to organ donation is aware that the hospital 13    where the potential donor is a patient does not allow 14    donation after circulatory death. 15        (4) That the patient or the individual given authority 16    to consent to organ donation has been informed of the 17    right to request a patient transfer to a facility allowing 18    donation after circulatory death.19        (5) That the patient or the individual given authority 20    to consent to organ donation has been informed of another 21    hospital that will allow donation after circulatory death 22    and will accept a patient transfer for the purpose of 23    donation after circulatory death; and that the cost of 24    transferring the patient to that other hospital will be 25    covered by the organ procurement organization, with no 26    additional cost to the patient or the individual given   SB0087- 63 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1    authority to consent to organ donation.2    The form required under this subsection must include a 3place for the signatures of the patient or the individual 4given authority to consent to organ donation and the 5representative of the organ procurement organization and space 6to provide the date that the form was signed. 7    (d) Within 2 years after the effective date of this 8amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, if the potential 9donor's gift is for the purpose of research or education, the 10patient or the individual given authority to consent to organ 11donation shall be provided the universal donor consent form. 12(Source: P.A. 98-172, eff. 1-1-14.) 13    (755 ILCS 50/5-47)14    Sec. 5-47. Rights and duties of procurement organizations 15and others.16    (a) When a hospital refers an individual at or near death 17to a procurement organization, the organization shall make a 18reasonable search of the records of the Secretary of State and 19any donor registry that it knows exists for the geographical 20area in which the individual resides to ascertain whether the 21individual has made an anatomical gift.22    (b) A procurement organization shall be allowed reasonable 23access to information in the records of the Secretary of State 24to ascertain whether an individual at or near death is a donor. 25If the individual is a donor who is an unemancipated minor, the   SB0087- 64 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1procurement organization shall conduct a reasonable search for 2a parent or guardian of the donor and shall provide the parent 3or guardian with an opportunity to amend or revoke the 4anatomical gift of the donor's body. 5    (c) Unless prohibited by law other than this Act, at any 6time after a donor's death, the person to which a part passes 7under Section 5-12 may conduct any reasonable examination 8necessary to ensure the medical suitability of the body or 9part for its intended purpose.10    (d) Unless prohibited by law other than this Act, an 11examination under subsection (c) may include an examination of 12all medical and dental records of the donor or prospective 13donor.14    (e) Upon referral by a hospital under subsection (a) of 15this Section, a procurement organization shall make a 16reasonable search for any person listed in subsection (b) of 17Section 5-5 having priority to make an anatomical gift on 18behalf of a prospective donor. If a procurement organization 19receives information that an anatomical gift to any other 20person was made, amended, or revoked, it shall promptly advise 21the other person of all relevant information.22    (f) Subject to subsection (i) of Section 5-12, the rights 23of the person to which a part passes under Section 5-12 are 24superior to the rights of all others with respect to the part. 25The person may accept or reject an anatomical gift in whole or 26in part. Subject to the terms of the document of gift and this   SB0087- 65 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1Act, a person who accepts an anatomical gift of an entire body 2may allow embalming, burial or cremation, and use of remains 3in a funeral service. If the gift is of a part, the person to 4which the part passes under Section 5-12, upon the death of the 5donor and before embalming, burial, or cremation, shall cause 6the part to be removed without unnecessary mutilation.7    (g) Neither the physician who attends the decedent at 8death nor the physician who determines the time of the 9decedent's death may participate in the procedures for 10removing or transplanting a part from the decedent.11    (h) A physician or technician may remove a donated part 12from the body of a donor that the physician or technician is 13qualified to remove. 14    (i) Not later than July 1, 2020, the Secretary of State 15shall create a database consisting of all individuals who have 16consented to having their names included in the First Person 17Consent organ and tissue donor registry maintained by the 18Secretary of State pursuant to Section 6-117 of the Illinois 19Vehicle Code. This database shall include identifying 20information for each individual, including, where available, 21the individual's name, address, gender, date of birth, 22driver's license or identification card number, social 23security number only if the donor does not have a driver's 24license or identification card number, and date of consent to 25join the registry. The Secretary of State shall update the 26database not less often than every 7 days. Upon executing a   SB0087- 66 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1data access agreement with the Secretary of State, an organ 2procurement organization, as defined in this Act, providing 3services in the State of Illinois shall be granted online 4access to the database for the purpose of determining whether 5a potential organ and tissue donor is included in the First 6Person Consent organ and tissue donor registry. 7    (j) Not later than 2 years after the effective date of this 8amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 9of Public Health shall create a database consisting of all 10universal donor consent forms. 11    The organ procurement organization shall indemnify and 12hold harmless the State of Illinois, its officials, and 13employees for any judgments, assessments, damages, fines, 14fees, and legal costs arising out of the acts, omissions, 15decisions, or other conduct of the organ procurement 16organization and its officials, employees, and agents in the 17use of the database. 18(Source: P.A. 100-41, eff. 1-1-18; 101-179, eff. 1-1-20.) 19    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.  SB0087- 67 -LRB104 06664 BAB 16700 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    New Act4    30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new5    410 ILCS 535/1from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 73-16    410 ILCS 535/21.77    625 ILCS 5/6-117from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-1178    755 ILCS 50/1-10was 755 ILCS 50/29    755 ILCS 50/5-5was 755 ILCS 50/310    755 ILCS 50/5-6 new11    755 ILCS 50/5-1212    755 ILCS 50/5-20was 755 ILCS 50/513    755 ILCS 50/5-2514    755 ILCS 50/5-27was 755 ILCS 60/3.515    755 ILCS 50/5-47